Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Literary Activity

153.600.
Appointment of Kentucky state poet laureate or writer laureate.

Every two (2) years the Governor may appoint a Kentucky state poet laureate or writer laureate for a maximum term of two (2) years.

The duties of the poet laureate or writer laureate shall be to:

Make a presentation on Kentucky Writers’ Day as authorized in KRS 153.620;

Act as a writing consultant to the State Department of Education and Kentucky Department for Libraries and Archives.

The Kentucky poet laureate or writer laureate shall serve without salary except that he may be reimbursed for expenses.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

153.620.
Kentucky Writers’ Day.

April 24 of each year is declared to be “Kentucky Writers’ Day.”

The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet may plan and direct a yearly event on April 24 honoring Kentucky writers. These plans may include designing programs for schools and civic or business organizations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 65, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 159, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 209, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 211, § 61, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 37, effective June 25, 2009.

153.630.
Central clearinghouse for information on Kentucky authors.

The Kentucky Department for Libraries and Archives shall establish and maintain, as funds permit, a central clearinghouse for information on Kentucky authors, including a statewide locator index of works and collections held by libraries in Kentucky.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 65, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

153.640.
Fund established.

There is hereby established a fund to carry out the purposes of KRS 153.600, 153.620, and 153.630.

The fund shall consist of all revenues derived from donations, grants from governmental or private sources, or state appropriations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 65, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.